Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 36. Chickasaw Trail Economic Development Compact
[Repealed]

§§ 57-36-1 through 57-36-5.
Repealed.

Repealed pursuant to their own terms, effective from and after June 30, 2003.

§57-36-1. [Laws, 1996, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 567, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000.).]

§57-36-3. [Laws, 1996, ch. 467, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 553, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§57-36-5. [Laws, 1996, ch. 467, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1996).]